czhyph.tex
.vì2ç3k
.vìt2
.vìv2
.vìz2
.vz1h2
.vz1p2
.vz1t2
.vze1
.vzed2
.vzep2
.vzes2
.vzeç2
.vzez2
.zd2
.zh2
.zch2
.zk2
.zl2
.zm2
.zp2
.zr2
.zt2
.zv2
.zne1
.znek2
.znem2
.znep2
.zne2rv
.znes2
.zneç2
.znet2
.za1
.z3a2larm
.z3akti
.zab2
.zaŸ2
.zad2
.zah2
.zach2
.zaj2
.zak2
.zal2
.zam2
.zap2
.zar2
.zaý2
.zas2
.zast2
.zaç2
.zat2
.zav2
.zaz2
.zane1
.zaned2
.zanes2
.zaneç2
.uza1m2
.uza1r2
.uza1v2
.z 1
.z b2
.z c2
.z d2
.z h2
.z ch2
.z j2
.z k2
.nejz 1k2
.z m2
.z p2
.z s2
.z st2
.z ç2
.z t2
.z v2
.z z2
.z2e1
.z3e2f
.zed2
.ze2d1n
.zej2
.zem2
.ze2ms
.ze2mn
.zep2
.zes2
.zet2
.zev2
.zez2
z…1
%ciz¡ pýedpony
.a1e2ro
.a1d2re
.a1g2no
.a1ch2r
.a1k2l
.a1k2re
.an1es
an3g2l
.an2t1ar
.anti1
.antik2
.antip2
an1t2ro1
.ar2ch1an
.as2pek
.a1s2t
.as3t2r
asym3p2t
.a1t2r
.ausçt2r
.auto1
.absçt2
.de1f2
.de1g2
.de1k2
.de1p2
.de2p3ta
.de2z1
.di1o
.di1p2
.dis3k2v
dis3k2r
dis3t2r
.di1u
.du1p2l
.epi1
.epig2
.ex1
.exk2
.exp2
.ext2
.ex2o
ex2i1s
.fyto1
.fytop2
.ide1
.ide2n
.in1
.inc2
.inf2
.ing2
.ink2
.ins2
.int2
.inter1
.interp2
.inters2
.kom1p2
.kon3g2
.kon3k2
.kon3s2
.konst2
.kon3t2
.kon3v2
.ko1o
.hyper1
.hypert2
.hypo1
.hypos2
.kata1k2l
.ko1i
.ko1e
.para1
.paraf2
.parag2
.re1
.ref2
.reg2
.re2j1
.rek2
.re2n2d
.re2n2t
.rep2
.re2pti
.res2
.re2sp.
.ret2
.sub1
.super1
.superp2
.supers2
.supra1
.sy1s2t
.te1o1
.topo1g2
.tran2s1
.tran3s2pi
.tran3s2k2r
.tran3s2c
.tri1
.trip2
.tri2Ÿk
.tri2st
.zoo1
.zoop2
.zoos2
%pý¡pony a koncovky
i1ent
ru1ov
3s2t2v¡
3s2t2vo.
3s2t2va.
3s2t2vu.
3s2t2ve
3s2tev.
3s2tevn
3s2t2v…m.
3s2t2vy.
3§e.
.m4§e.
3hle.
c4hle.
3li.
3ly.
3la.
3nout.
3nouti.
i1 n
a1tb
e1tb
i1tb
1t2va.
1t2vy.
1t2vØ.
1t2vu.
1t2vou.
1t2ev.
1t2v m.
1t2v ch.
1t2vami.
3s2t2v
a4s3t2v
 4st3v
3k2rac
3k2rat
3k2r t.
3k2r te.
3p2lex
1t2rof
1s2trof
%vìjimky
.a1v2çak
.atmo1s2f
.ce1d1r
Ÿesko3s4l
Ÿesko3b4r
.e1gyp2t1
.elek1t
.elek3t1r
.elek3t1ý
elip1s
elip1t
eu1k2lei1d
.i1h2ned
kladko1s2t2roj
moýe1p2lav
.pe1t1r
oka1m§i
s2t2ran
z2d2rav
z…1s2ta}
%
